Hawaii statutes.
§352-2.1 Purpose. (a) This chapter
creates within the department of human services, and to be placed within the
office of youth services under the supervision of the director and such other
subordinates as the director shall designate, the Hawaii youth correctional
facilities, to provide for the custody, rehabilitation, and institutional care
and services to prepare for reentry into their communities and families, youth
committed by the courts of the State.

(b) The policy and purpose of this chapter is
to harmonize the sometimes conflicting requirements of public safety, secure
placement, and individualized services for law violators in the custody and
care of the director. To that end, the director shall provide the opportunity
for intelligence and aptitude evaluation, psychological testing and counseling,
prevocational and vocational training, and employment counseling to all persons
committed to the Hawaii youth correctional facilities. Counseling services
shall be available to the committed person's family during the term of
commitment. The director shall coordinate services provided to the facilities
by other departments and agencies, to realize these policies and purposes. [L
1985, c 156, §3; am L 1987, c 338, §10; am L 1989, c 211, §8; am L 1991, c 114,
§3; am L 2007, c 33, §1]

Case Notes

As this chapter clearly mandates that youth correctional
facilities be placed under the supervision of the department of human services,
the Hawaii youth correctional facility is a state correctional facility. 113
H. 60, 148 P.3d 493 (2006).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next